public/third-party/apertium-translations/apertium-spa.spa.metadix
<pardef n="aco/ger__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>geríamos</l>  <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gería</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>geríais</l>   <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gerías</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gerían</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gería</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>geremos</l>   <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>geré</l>      <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>geréis</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gerás</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gerán</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gerá</l>      <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>giéremos</l>  <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>giere</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>giereis</l>   <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gieres</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gieren</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>giere</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giendo</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giéndo</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gimos</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gí</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gisteis</l>   <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giste</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gieron</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gió</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jamos</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jámo</l>      <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jámos</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ged</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ged</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantad' was replaced --><par n="S__haz"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gé</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantá"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>géd</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantád' was replaced --><par n="S__ház"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jan</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ja</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ger</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ger</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gér</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantár"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gíamos</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gía</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gíais</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gías</l>      <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gían</l>      <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gía</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giéramos</l>  <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>giésemos</l>  <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giera</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>giese</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gierais</l>   <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gieseis</l>   <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gieras</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gieses</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gieran</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>giesen</l>    <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giera</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>giese</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gidas</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gida</l>      <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gidos</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gido</l>      <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gemos</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jo</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>géis</l>      <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ges</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jamos</l>     <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ja</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jáis</l>      <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jas</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jan</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ja</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="acó/ger__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cánta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jan</l>       <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ja</l>        <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="acoger">          <i>aco</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acoger">          <p><l>acó</l>       <r>aco</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cardioproteger">        <i>cardioprote</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="coger">           <i>co</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="coger el sueño"><i>co</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>el<b/>sueño</l><r><g><b/>el<b/>sueño</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="converger" a="prompsit2adn"><i>conver</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="converger" a="prompsit2adn"><p><l>convér</l><r>conver</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="coger">           <p><l>có</l>        <r>co</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desencoger">      <i>desenco</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desencoger">      <p><l>desencó</l>   <r>desenco</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="emerger" a="prompsit2adn"><i>emer</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="emerger" a="prompsit2adn"><p><l>emér</l><r>emer</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="encoger">         <i>enco</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="encoger">         <p><l>encó</l>      <r>enco</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="escoger">         <i>esco</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="escoger">         <p><l>escó</l>      <r>esco</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="proteger">        <i>prote</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="proteger">        <p><l>proté</l>     <r>prote</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recoger">         <i>reco</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recoger">         <p><l>recó</l>      <r>reco</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sobrecoger">      <i>sobreco</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sobrecoger">      <p><l>sobrecó</l>   <r>sobreco</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="coger los bártulos"><i>co</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>los<b/>bártulos</l><r><g><b/>los<b/>bártulos</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="coger los bártulos"><p><l>có</l><r>co</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>los<b/>bártulos</l><r><g><b/>los<b/>bártulos</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="autoproteger">    <i>autoprote</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="autoproteger">    <p><l>autoproté</l><r>autoprote</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="coger el truco">  <i>co</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>el<b/>truco</l><r><g><b/>el<b/>truco</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="coger el truco">  <p><l>có</l><r>co</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>el<b/>truco</l><r><g><b/>el<b/>truco</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="coger el truquillo"><i>co</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>el<b/>truquillo</l><r><g><b/>el<b/>truquillo</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="coger el truquillo"><p><l>có</l><r>co</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>el<b/>truquillo</l><r><g><b/>el<b/>truquillo</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="coger el tranquillo"><i>co</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>el<b/>tranquillo</l><r><g><b/>el<b/>tranquillo</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="coger el tranquillo"><p><l>có</l><r>co</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/><p><l><b/>el<b/>tranquillo</l><r><g><b/>el<b/>tranquillo</g></r></p></e>
<e a="GVA" lm="absterger">       <i>abster</i><par n="aco/ger__vblex"/></e>
<e a="GVA" lm="absterger">       <p><l>abstér</l><r>abster</r></p><par n="acó/ger__vblex"/></e>
